Illinois, session 104th, SB2050.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Section 3.1-6 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/3.1-6)7    Sec. 3.1-6. Special deer, turkey, and combination hunting 8licenses.9    (a) For the purpose of this Section:10    "Bona fide equity member" means an individual who:11        (1) (i) became a member upon the formation of the 12    limited liability company or (ii) has purchased a 13    distributional interest in a limited liability company for 14    a value equal to the percentage of the appraised value of 15    the LLC assets represented by the distributional interest 16    in the LLC and subsequently becomes a member of the 17    company under Article 30 of the Limited Liability Company 18    Act; and19        (2) intends to retain the membership for at least 5 20    years.21    "Bona fide equity partner" means an individual who:22        (1) (i) became a partner, either general or limited, 23    upon the formation of a partnership or limited   SB2050- 2 -LRB104 10881 BDA 20963 b1    partnership, or (ii) has purchased, acquired, or been 2    gifted a partnership interest accurately representing his 3    or her percentage distributional interest in the profits, 4    losses, and assets of a partnership or limited 5    partnership;6        (2) intends to retain ownership of the partnership 7    interest for at least 5 years; and8        (3) is a resident of this State.9    "Bona fide equity shareholder" means an individual who:10        (1) purchased, for market price, publicly sold stock 11    shares in a corporation, purchased shares of a 12    privately-held corporation for a value equal to the 13    percentage of the appraised value of the corporate assets 14    represented by the ownership in the corporation, or is a 15    member of a closely-held family-owned corporation and has 16    purchased or been gifted with shares of stock in the 17    corporation accurately reflecting his or her percentage of 18    ownership; and19        (2) intends to retain the ownership of the shares of 20    stock for at least 5 years.21    (b) Landowner Deer, Turkey, and combination permits shall 22be issued without charge to:23        (1) Illinois landowners residing in this State who own 24    at least 40 acres of Illinois land and wish to hunt upon 25    their land only;26        (2) resident tenants of at least 40 acres of   SB2050- 3 -LRB104 10881 BDA 20963 b1    commercial agricultural land where they will hunt; and2        (3) bona fide equity shareholders of a corporation, 3    bona fide equity members of a limited liability company, 4    or bona fide equity partners of a general or limited 5    partnership which owns at least 40 acres of land in a 6    county in this State who wish to hunt on the 7    corporation's, company's, or partnership's land only. One 8    permit shall be issued without charge to one bona fide 9    equity shareholder, one bona fide equity member, or one 10    bona fide equity partner for each 40 acres of land owned by 11    the corporation, company, or partnership in a county; 12    however, the number of permits issued without charge to 13    bona fide equity shareholders of any corporation or bona 14    fide equity members of a limited liability company in any 15    county shall not exceed 15, and shall not exceed 3 in the 16    case of bona fide equity partners of a partnership. 17    Bona fide landowners or tenants who do not wish to hunt 18only on the land they own, rent, or lease or bona fide equity 19shareholders, bona fide equity members, or bona fide equity 20partners who do not wish to hunt only on the land owned by the 21corporation, limited liability company, or partnership shall 22be charged the same fee as the applicant who is not a 23landowner, tenant, bona fide equity shareholder, bona fide 24equity member, or bona fide equity partner. Nonresidents of 25this State who own at least 40 acres of land and wish to hunt 26on their land only shall be charged a fee set by administrative   SB2050- 4 -LRB104 10881 BDA 20963 b1rule. The method for obtaining these permits shall be 2prescribed by administrative rule.3    (c) The deer, turkey, or combination hunting permit issued 4without fee shall be valid on all farm lands year-round which 5the person to whom it is issued owns, leases or rents, except 6that in the case of a permit issued to a bona fide equity 7shareholder, bona fide equity member, or bona fide equity 8partner, the permit shall be valid on all lands owned by the 9corporation, limited liability company, or partnership in the 10county. 11    Resident landowners shall be entitled to up to 5 Resident 12Deer Archery Either-Sex Permits and up to 5 Resident Deer 13Either-Sex Firearm Permits without charge. 14(Source: P.A. 99-869, eff. 1-1-17.)